Texas, session 892, SB26.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subchapter D, Chapter 5, Property Code, is amended by adding Section 5.088 to read as follows: Sec. 5.088.  SPANISH TRANSLATION REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY TRANSACTIONS. (a)  In this section, "colonia" means a geographic area that: (1)  is an economically distressed area as defined by Section 17.921, Water Code; (2)  is located in a county any part of which is within 62 miles of an international border; and (3)  consists of 11 or more dwellings that are located in close proximity to each other in an area that may be described as a community or neighborhood. (b)  A copy of an executory contract for conveyance of residential real property located in a colonia written in Spanish must be provided if the purchaser or potential purchaser requests that the contract be provided in Spanish. (c)  The copy of the executory contract described by Subsection (b) must be written by a translator certified in Spanish. (d)  Notwithstanding Subsection (b), the executed contract and any other binding and controlling document between the seller and purchaser must be written in English. (e)  Nothing in this section may be construed to affect an executory contract for the conveyance of residential real property not located in a colonia. SECTION 2.  The changes in law made by this Act apply only to a contract entered into on or after the effective date of this Act. A contract entered into before the effective date of this Act is governed by the law in effect immediately before the effective date of this Act, and that law is continued in effect for that purpose. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.